hu_hu.affix
SFX R 0 jeinkéiül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéiért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéivé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéivel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéitől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéit [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéiről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéire [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéinél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéinek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéin [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéiig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéihez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéiből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéiben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéibe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéi [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkéből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkében [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkébe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinké [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinktől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkre [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinknél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinknek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkként [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkké [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkkor [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkkel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinket [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinken [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinkbe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeink [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeinek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jein [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimévé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimével [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimétől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimét [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimére [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiménél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimének [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimén [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméiül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméiért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméivé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméivel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméitől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméit [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméiről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméire [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméinél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméinek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméin [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméiig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméihez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméiből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméiben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméibe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméi [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiméből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimében [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimébe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimtől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimre [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimnél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimnek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimmé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimmel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimként [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimkor [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimet [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimen [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeimbe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeim [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikévé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikével [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikétől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikét [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikére [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikénél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiként [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikének [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikén [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéiül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéiért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéivé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéivel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéitől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéit [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéiről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéire [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéinél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéinek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéin [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéiig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéihez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéiből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéiben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéibe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéi [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikéből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikében [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikébe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiké [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiktől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikre [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikor [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiknél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiknek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikként [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikké [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikkor [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikkel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiket [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiken [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeikbe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeik [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeihez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidévé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidével [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidétől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidét [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidére [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidénél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidének [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidén [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéiül [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéiért [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéivé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéivel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéitől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéit [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéiről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéire [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéinél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéinek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéin [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéiig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéihez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéiből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéiben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéibe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéi [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidéből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidében [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidébe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidtől [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidről [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidre [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidnél [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidnek [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidként [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidkor [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidig [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidhez [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidet [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiden [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiddé [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiddel [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeidbe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeid [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiből [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeiben [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jeibe [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 jei [^áeéóöőuúüű]
SFX R 0 je [áéiíóőuúüűy]
SFX R 0 je [ae]e
SFX R 0 je [^áeéóöőuúüű]
