hu_hu.dict
ü-/CWRŢŃŐj)
ötvenkettő/ŢWŰMRbhc
önjelölt/VNËŻj×LÝÔéyČŔŕRYcź
óraüveg/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRTtYcź
érző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝X)
éljenző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝X
áttét/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRTtYc¸źl
álszent/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRYcź
Újlengyel/VËŻj×LnÓqśR,¸l
Érsekvadkert/VËŻj×LnÓqśR,¸l
zümmögő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
zseni/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
x-/LVÓ×nRTtj)
vízmű/WŢŘÔyjYcČR	
vékonypénzű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
vitézlő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
videofilm/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRYcź
verdikt/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl
varieté/ŐAUBVLQRĘŽËŻijĎĐÓáéçč˛łÄäĂăYcˇť¸ź
utánégető/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
tű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
töltényűr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RYc˝
tényező/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
tulaezüst/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
transz-izomer/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRTtcź
timolftalein/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRvc¸źl
terpentin/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl
tengerisün/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRYc¸˝l
tc.-/LVÓ×nRTtj)
t-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
szüret/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRTtYc¸źl
szénapetrence/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
szleng/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸ź
szerencse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
szebb/×nÓBDLVR)
spagetti/ŐAUBVLQRĘŽËŻijĎĐÓáéçč˛łÄäĂăYcˇť¸ź
semmi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸źL	
rím/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRTtYc¸ź
rezonőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíyČÁ˙RTtYc˝
rakett/UVĘŽËŻijÖ×KLmnŇÓáéçč˛ĂăłÄäQRYcˇť¸źkl
pszilocibin/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRvc¸źl
poggyászmegőrző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
pezsgő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝X)
parvenü/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
oligocén/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl
nyitvatermő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
nehézhidrogén/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRvc¸źl
nagybérlő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
másminő/BŢŐÔVLR
misekendő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
menyét/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl
marhasült/VNËŻj×LÝÔéyČŔŕRYcź
lövölde/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
lm-/LVÓ×nRTtj)
legeslegtöbbféle/ĐÓŐBGLVR
kötöző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
kótyavetye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
kányafű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝Ř	
koraidenevér/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRTtYcź
kiterjedésű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
kiemelő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
kerep/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸źl
kaszkadőr/WĚŻjŘMÝÔíčłĹĺRTtYc¸˝l
jólelkű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
iszapleeresztő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
ige/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
hétvége/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź	
higiéné/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
határátkelő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
haditett/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRTtYcź
gyöngyvessző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
glicil/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRvc¸źl
fülbeeresztő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
főfelügyelő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
freeware-/LVÓ×nRTtj)	ph:fríver-
filmkölcsönző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
felelő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
fajhő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁ˙Yc˝
esernyő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
előidejű/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíčłĹĺYc¸˝
egyed/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäTtYc¸źlRabhz)
dzsóker/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRTtYc¸źl
didi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
cuclisüveg/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRTtYcź
csillagrendszer/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRYcź
ciánhidrin/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRvc¸źl
cech/VËŻj×LnÓéčłÄäRYc¸ź
bélyegzendő/CÔŐŢDHWRMX)
borosüveg/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRTtYcź
betűfém/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRYcź
baudelaire-es/Ó×nBGVLR)	ph:bodleres
arzén/UVĘŽËŻijÖ×KLmnŇÓáéçč˛ĂăłÄäQRYcˇť¸źkl
alprojekt/UVĘŽËŻijÖ×KLmnŇÓáéyÇżßČQRYcťź
ablaküveg/VËŻj×LnÓéyČŔŕRTtYcź
ötvenrendbeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
öntörvényű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
ízelt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
éretlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
áttehető/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
vízszínű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
violakék/Ó×nGVËLRlą
valósághű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
történelmi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
tízórai/°BÓŐĐGVËR
tettetett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
teli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
születendő/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
százrétű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
szerbgyűlölő/CÔŐŢHWĚR
szakképzett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
sikerületlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
rosszkedvű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
pökendő/XCÔŐŢHWĚR)
petrezselyemzöld/Ô×ÝGVĚNMRlą
növetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlX)
nyolcórai/°BÓŐĐGVËR
nemeuklideszi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
nagyfejű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
molylepte/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
messzemenő/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
megrögzött/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
megannyi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
lélegző/XCÔŐŢHWĚR
lelkiismeretlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
közművelődésügyi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
kézbesíthetetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
kényszeredett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
kiterjedt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
kilencpercenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
khakizöld/Ô×ÝGVĚNRlą
kedvezőtlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
jelzett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
illetőségű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
húszheti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hárompercenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hetvenórai/°BÓŐĐGVËR
hatrendbeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hadviselt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
groteszk/Ó×nGVËLRlą
férjezetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
forgalomképtelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
felszereletlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
feddhetetlen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
eseménytelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
elégtelen/Ó×nGVËLRlą
elkésett/Ó×nGVËLRlą
egyhavi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
drótnélküli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
csini/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
bélelt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
beszélt/Ó×nGVËLRlą
balvégzetű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
alakhű/ąCÔŐŢHWĚR
Zsil/VËŻj×LnÓqśR,¸
XML-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
Weiszfeiler/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Vályi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Vermesy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Udmurtföld/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Trócsányi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Tibike/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Taucher/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Sándorfi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Sztv.-/BVRĐŃŐj)
Szepessy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Szathmári/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Spett/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸
Semperger/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Schoefft/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Santelli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Réthei/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Ripp/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸
Reagan/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Péczely/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Poldini/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Petheő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔqČÁ˙,¸
Papkeszi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
OTP-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Nikolett/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Nagyküküllő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔqś,¸
Márokföld/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqśR,¸l
Millner/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Megyehíd/VËŻj×LnÓqśR,¸l
Makrai/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
M7-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
Litke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Leibitzer/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Kürschner/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Kéry/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸
Krieger/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Kmety/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸
Kevi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Kelenföld/WĚŻjŘMÝÔqČÁ˙R,¸l
Kaczvinszky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
JSP-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Ibi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Hoványi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Herodek/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Hasenfeld/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Göttingen/VËŻj×LnÓqśR,¸l
Győző/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔqČÁ˙,¸
Goldzieher/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Gerber/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Fürtike/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Flt.-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Feld/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸
Etel/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Endréd/VËŻj×LnÓqśR,¸l
Eb-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Dunakeszi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Detrekőy/WĚŻjŐBĐŃqČÁ˙R,¸l
DTD-/BVRĐŃŐj)
Csögle/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Csengery/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Cecil/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Bélkő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔqś,¸
Brumiller/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
Bizse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Berkesy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Bedy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸
Bakonycsernye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Aszalai/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Alsted/VËŻj×LnÓqČŔŕR,¸l
ACL-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
2000-es/Ó×nBGVLR1)
